Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20189-606.03
Keno writer, defined.

(1) Keno writer
means a person whose primary responsibilities include accepting inside tickets
or other requests for wagers and payments of wagers from players, issuing
outside tickets, voiding tickets, and redeeming winning tickets.

(2) Keno writer
does not include a keno manager, a lottery operator, or any other person who
is directly in charge of the manual selection of numbers.

Laws 2014, LB259, § 3.